Arkansas, session 2025, HB1407.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 80, vested the judicial
power of the State of Arkansas in the judicial department;
(2) Over the past twenty-five (25) years, the state has
transitioned from hundreds of part-time local municipal court, city court,
and district court judges to seventy (70) full-time state district court
judges resulting from a consolidation of these courts into a unified state
system of district courts;
(3) The Supreme Court in In re Amendment 80, 2025 Ark. 5,
directed the Administrative Office of the Courts to:
(A) Assist the district judges in forming the Arkansas
District Judges Judicial Council similar to that of the circuit court; and
(B) Support the new judicial council for district judges
as it has supported the Arkansas Judicial Council for decades.
(4) Distributions from the State Administration of Justice Fund
are currently made to the Arkansas District Judges Council, Inc., for the
*CEB105*
02/05/2025 8:32:24 AM CEB105

HB1407
Executive Director of the Arkansas District Judges Council, Inc.; and
(5) It is no longer necessary for the state to support the
Arkansas District Judges Council, Inc., in this manner.
(b) The General Assembly intends this act to ensure the efficient use
of the State Administration of Justice Fund.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 16-10-310(b), concerning the distribution
of revenue credited to the State Administration of Justice Fund, is amended
to read as follows:
(b) The revenue described in subsection (a) of this section shall be
distributed to the following state programs and state agencies in monthly
installments of at least one-twelfth (1/12) of the annual allocation provided
for each state program or state agency from the State Administration of
Justice Fund subject to the limitations stated in this section:
(1) The Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas for the
purpose of and as regulated by §§ 6-64-604 — 6-64-606;
(2) The Public Health Fund and the Drug Abuse Prevention and
Treatment Fund for use in the drug abuse prevention and treatment program of
the Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of the
Department of Human Services;
(3) The Division of Arkansas State Police for the State Police
Retirement Fund;
(4) The Crime Victims Reparations Revolving Fund for the purpose
of and as regulated by the Arkansas Crime Victims Reparations Act, § 16-90-
701 et seq.;
(5) The Prosecutor Coordinator's office for deposit into the Law
Enforcement and Prosecutor Drug Enforcement Training Fund;
(6) The Crime Information System Fund;
(7) The Justice Building Construction Fund;
(8) The District Court Judge and District Court Clerk Education
Fund;
(9) The Judges Retirement Fund;
(10) The State Central Services Fund for the benefit of the
Arkansas Public Defender Commission;
(11) The Court Reporter's Fund;
(12) The Justice Building Fund;
02/05/2025 8:32:24 AM CEB105

HB1407
(13) The Arkansas Counties Alcohol and Drug Abuse and Crime
Prevention Program Fund;
(14) The Administrative Office of the Courts to fund the Trial
Court Administrator Fund;
(15) The Division of Arkansas State Police Fund;
(16) The State Central Services Fund for the benefit of the
Division of Dependency-Neglect Representation of the Administrative Office of
the Courts;
(17) The Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account for the benefit of
the State Crime Laboratory;
(18) The Arkansas District Judges Council, Inc., for the
Executive Director of the Arkansas District Judges Council, Inc.;
(19)(18) The Public Legal Aid Fund;
(20)(19) The Administrative Office of the Courts for county
reimbursements for jurors; and
(21)(20) The Administrative Office of the Courts to reimburse
the State Central Services Fund for the Drug Court Coordinator.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 16-10-310(c)(1)(A), concerning the priority
of allocations if the State Administration of Justice Fund balance is
inadequate to fully fund all authorized monthly allocations, is amended to
read as follows:
(1)(A) The available revenue and remaining State Administration
of Justice Fund balance shall be distributed first to fully fund the monthly
allocation for:
(i) The Court Reporter's Fund;
(ii) The Arkansas District Judges Council, Inc., for
the Executive Director of the Arkansas District Judges Council, Inc.; and
(iii)(ii) The Administrative Office of the Courts to
fund the Trial Court Administrator Fund.






02/05/2025 8:32:24 AM CEB105